Washington statutes.
RCW 1.60.030

Award presentation.

(1) The award will be presented by the governor of the state of Washington to the recipient or recipients.

(2) If the governor is unable to present the award, the governor may delegate the presenting of the award to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, or the chief justice of the supreme court.

[ 2023 c 131 s 1; 2015 c 4 s 3; 2000 c 224 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 4: See note following RCW 1.60.010.